Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB578.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 341.005 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Approved job training or certification program" means:
(a) A program approved by the secretary that leads to a short-term certificate or
credential, an industry-recognized certificate, diploma, or associate of applied
science degree in one (1) of Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand workforce
sectors identified by the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board and the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(b) A program approved and determined by the secretary to improve an
individual's employability in a high-wage, high-demand occupation; or
(c) A training program approved under the Trade Act of 1974, 19 U.S.C. sec.
2296;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(3) "Certified mail" has the same meaning as in KRS 446.010;
(4) "Commission" means the Unemployment Insurance Commission;
(5)[(4)] "Enhanced federal benefits" means any temporary federally funded or
partially federally funded benefits, administered by the Commonwealth and payable
through voluntary agreements between the Commonwealth and the United States
Department of Labor, that supplement or increase weekly state benefit amounts.
"Enhanced federal benefits" does not mean benefits such as, without limitation,
benefits otherwise calculated and distributed in accordance with KRS 341.350 to
341.415, extended benefits provided for in KRS 341.700 to 341.740, shared work
benefits provided for in KRS 341.4161 to 341.4173, disaster unemployment
assistance benefits, 42 U.S.C. sec. 5177, or trade readjustment allowances, 19
U.S.C. secs. 2291 to 2294, or any amendments thereto;
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/8/2025 3:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1025
(6)[(5)] "Multi-factor authentication" means authentication through verification of
at least two (2) of the following methods of authentication factors:
1. Knowledge factors, such as a password;
2. Possession factors, such as a token or text message on a mobile phone; or
3. Inherence factors, such as a biometric characteristic;
(7) "Notice" means any communication from the secretary or any employer to
employers or employees required under this chapter;
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her
duly authorized representative; and
(9)[(6)] "State average unemployment rate" means the seasonal adjusted statewide
unemployment rate that applies to the six (6) month period in which the claim is
filed. One six (6) month period shall begin on January 1 of each year and one six
(6) month period shall begin on July 1 of each year. For the six (6) month period
beginning on January 1, the state average unemployment rate shall be the average
of Kentucky's seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the preceding months of
July, August, and September. For the six (6) month period beginning on July 1, the
state average unemployment rate shall be the average of Kentucky's seasonal
adjusted unemployment rates for the preceding months of January, February, and
March. In calculating the state average unemployment rate, the cabinet shall utilize
the most recent seasonal adjusted unemployment rate determined by the United
States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 341 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Unless otherwise provided by law, any notice from the secretary or any employer to
employers or employees required under this chapter shall be in writing and delivered
by any method of governmental, commercial, or electronic delivery. The secretary shall
provide employers and employees the option to receive only electronic notices. The
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/8/2025 3:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1025
electronic notice system shall utilize effective privacy controls, which shall include
multi-factor authentication procedures for any individual accessing nonpublic
information.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/8/2025 3:44 PM Jacketed